Hawaii statutes.
[PART X.
SURVEILLANCE REVIEW UNIT]

[§28‑141] Surveillance review unit. There is
established in the department of the attorney general a surveillance review
unit, which shall be responsible for reviewing all applications for
interception of wire, oral, or electronic communications under chapter 803
prior to their submittal to a designated judge, regardless of whether submitted
by county or state investigative or law enforcement officers. A surveillance
review unit deputy attorney general shall review the application in a timely
manner to ensure it meets the requirements of part IV of chapter 803 and
applicable law and recommend any necessary additions or changes to the
application. Thereafter, the surveillance review unit deputy attorney general
shall prepare a written memorandum recommending approval or disapproval of the
application, which shall be submitted to the district court judge or designated
judge with the application. The attorney general shall establish standards and
procedures for the timely review of these applications to ensure continuity and
conformity with applicable law. [L 2006, c 200, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next